Georgia, session 2025_26, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-142.6.
(a) On or before December 31, 2025, the department shall submit a waiver request to the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act to conduct a
demonstration project to provide treatment services under Medicaid to persons in this state
living with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). Such demonstration project shall be
H. B. 178
- 1 -

LC 57 0191
designed to provide more effective, early treatment of HIV to persons in this state by
making available a package of services, including antiretrovirals. The eligibility criteria
for recipients shall include having a diagnosis of HIV, an income of less than 138 percent
of the federal poverty level, and no health insurance.
(b) Upon approval of the waiver, the department shall take all necessary steps to
implement the terms and conditions of the waiver."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 178
- 2 -